apertium-tur-uzb.tur.lexc
LEXICON V-IV-DIR-AR 

%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REC-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REF-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: DOUBLE-EVIDENTIAL ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

!LEXICON DET-REF

! %<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON TIT 

%<title%>: # ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Stem lexica
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Postpositions

! Nominative
gibi:gibi POST ; ! ""
için:İçin POST ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
için:için POST ; ! ""
ile:İle POST ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
ile:ile POST ; ! ""
kadar:kadar POST ; ! ""
hakkında:hakkında POST ; ! "regarding"
halinde:halinde POST ; ! "ın case of"
takdirde:takdirde POST ; ! "in case of" 
boyunca:boyunca POST ; ! "during"
haline:haline POST ; ! "into"
uyarınca:uyarınca POST; ! "according to"
kala:kala POST ; ! "til"
edici:edici POST ; ! @@@ really weird behaviour

! Genıtıve

ardından:ardından POST ; ! ""
aleyhinde:aleyhinde POST ; ! "against" @@@ALSO NOM


! Dative
doğru:doğru POST ; ! ""
göre:göre POST ; ! ""
kadar:kadar POST ; ! ""
karşı:karşı POST ; ! ""
rağmen:rağmen POST ; ! ""
ait:ait POST ; ! ""
dek:dek POST ; ! "until"
aykırı:aykırı POST ; ! "against"

! Ablative
başka:başka POST ; ! ""
beri:beri POST ; ! ""
bu% yana:bu% yana POST ; ! ""
dolayı:dolayı POST ; ! ""
ötürü:ötürü POST ; ! ""
itibaren:itibaren POST ; ! ""
önce:önce POST ; ! ""
sonra:sonra POST ; ! ""
yana:yana POST ; ! ""

! Comitative

kıyaslandığında:kıyaslandığında POST ; ! ""
ilgili:ilgili POST ; ! "regarding"
İlgili:İlgili POST ; ! """ HACK MT USE


LEXICON Pronouns

PRON-PERS ; 

PRON-ITG ; 

bu:bu PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"
şu:şu PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"
o:o PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"

başka:başka PRON-IND ; ! "other"


hiçbir% şey:hiçbirşey PRON-NEG ; ! "nothing" ! Dir/LR
hiçbir% şey:hiç% birşey PRON-NEG ; ! "nothing" ! Dir/LR
hiçbir% şey:hiçbir% şey PRON-NEG ; ! "nothing"
hiç% kimse:hiç% kimse PRON-NEG ; ! "nobody"
herkes:herkes PRON-QNT ; ! "everybody"
kimse:kimse PRON-QNT ; ! "nobody"
birisi:birisi PRON-QNT ; ! "somebody"
bazıları:bazıları PRON-QNT ; ! "some of them"

birbirine:birbirine PRON-REF ; ! "each other" @@@@ CHeCK
öz:öz PRON-REF ; ! "self"
kendi:kendi PRON-REF ; ! "self"

ora:ora PRON-ADV ; 
bura:bura PRON-ADV ; 
şura:şura PRON-ADV ; 

LEXICON Determiners

bu:bu DET-DEM ; ! "this"
şu:şu DET-DEM ; ! "this"
o:o DET-DEM ; ! "this"

hep:hep DET-QNT ; ! "all" @@@@ TAKES CASES
hepsi:hepsi DET-QNT ; ! "all"
bütün:bütün DET-QNT ; ! "every"

bir:bir DET-IND ; ! "a, one"
birkaç:birkaç DET-IND ; ! "some"

hiç% bir:hiç% bir DET-NEG ; ! ""

birkaç% tane:birkaç% tane DET-QNT ; ! "some units"
birtakım:birtakım DET-QNT ; ! "several"
birçok:birçok DET-QNT ; ! "a lot of"
biraz:biraz DET-QNT ; ! "a bit"
bir% miktar:bir% miktar DET-QNT ; ! "some measures"
bazı:bazı DET-QNT ; ! "some"
kimi:kimi DET-QNT ; ! "some (people)"
bir% kısım:bir% kısım DET-QNT ; ! "some"
bu% kadar:bu% kadar DET-QNT ; ! "this much"
şu% kadar:şu% kadar DET-QNT ; ! "that much"
o% kadar:o% kadar DET-QNT ; ! "this much"
çok:çok DET-QNT ; ! "many"
çoğu:çoğu DET-QNT ; ! "many" 
!az:az DET-QNT ; ! "a little"
!fazla:fazla DET-QNT ; ! "a lot"
hiçbir:hiçbir DET-QNT ; ! "nothing"
her:her DET-DEM ; ! "every"
bütün:bütün DET-DEM ; ! "the whole"
tüm:tüm DET-DEM ; ! "the whole"
aynı:aynı DET-DEM ; ! "the same"
öteki:öteki DET-DEM ; ! "the other"
öbür:öbür DET-DEM ; !  "the other"
tek:tek DET-IND ; ! "a" 
herhangi:herhangi DET-IND ; ! "any"
herhangi% bir:herhangi% bir DET-IND ; ! "anyone"
ne% kadar:ne% kadar DET-ITG ; ! "how much"


!!!!TO BE REVIEWED !!!!

binlerce:binlerce DET-QNT ; ! "thousands of"
yüzlerce:yüzlerce DET-QNT ; ! "hundreds of"
düzinelerce:düzinelerce DET-QNT ; ! "dozens of"
milyonlarca:milyonlarca DET-QNT ; ! "millions of"



birer:birer DET-QNT ; ! "one each"
tümü:tümü DET-QNT ; ! "all of"



LEXICON Numerals

sıfır:sıfır NUM ; ! "zero"
bir:bir NUM ; ! "one"
iki:İki NUM ; ! "two" ! Dir/LR
iki:iki NUM ; ! "two"
üç:üç NUM ; ! "three"
dört:dört%{v%} NUM ; ! "four"
beş:beş NUM ; ! "five"
altı:altı NUM ; ! "six"
yedi:yedi NUM ; ! "seven"
sekiz:sekiz NUM ; ! "eight"
dokuz:dokuz NUM ; ! "nine"
on:on NUM ; ! "ten"

yüz:yüz NUM ; ! "hundred"
bin:bin NUM ; ! "thousand"
milyon:milyon NUM ; ! "million"
milyar:milyar NUM ; ! "milliard"
bilyon:bilyon NUM ; ! "billion"
trilyon:trilyon NUM ; ! "trillion"
katrilyon:katrilyon NUM ; ! ""
buçuk:buçuk NUM ; ! "half"

LEXICON Titles

Profesör:Profesör TIT ; ! ""
Dr:Dr TIT ; ! ""
paşa:paşa TIT ; ! "pasha"


LEXICON Interjections 

evet:evet INTERJ ; ! "yes"
hayır:hayır INTERJ ; ! "no"


LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ; 
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;

!==============!
 LEXICON Digits ! Use/Circ
!==============!


%0:%0 NUM ;  ! Use/Circ
№:№ DIGITLEX ;  ! Use/Circ
DIGITLEX ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT ; ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT-REST ; ! Use/Circ

! FIXME: We probably need a flag diacritic here, or an alternative '<percent>' lexicon
%%:%% DIGITLEX ;  ! Use/Circ

LEXICON Verbs 
seçil:seçil V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! ""
gir:gir V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! enter"
git:git%{v%} V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "go"
don:don V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "freeze"
eş:eş V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "scratch"
yak:yak V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "fire"
yan:yan V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "burn, be on fire"
yat:yat V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "lie up"
kız:kız V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "be angry"
kon:kon V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "perch"
kop:kop V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "shear off"
koş:koş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "run"
küfret:küfret V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "revile"
kus:kus V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "vomit"
küs:küs V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "become stunted"
manevra% yap:manevra% yap V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "manoeuver"
meylet:meylet V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "be inclined"
nükset:nükset V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "recur"
on:on V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "be happy"
öt:öt V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "warble"
pasta% yap:pasta% yap V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "make a cake"
piş:piş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "cook"
pus:pus V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "shrink"
san:san V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "suppose"
sap:sap V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "deviate"
şaş:şaş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "amaze"
sek:sek V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "rebound"
sığ:sığ V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "fit into"
sin:sin V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "permeate"
sın:sın V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "feel frightened"
şiş:şiş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "swell"
sız:sız V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "leak"
sol:sol V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "fade"
sön:sön V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "be deflated"
şükret:şükret V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "render thanks"
sus:sus V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "to be quiet"
tap:tap V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "worship"
taş:taş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "pour out"
tüt:tüt V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "fumatory"
uç:uç V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "fly"
ürk:ürk V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "scare"
üş:üş V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "concentrate at somewhere"
vazgeç:vazgeç V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "give up"
yağ:yağ V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "rain down on"
yan:yan V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "burn, take fire"
yet:yet V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "suffice"
yıl:yıl V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "give up"
yit:yit V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "be lost"
yun:yun V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "bathe"
zulmet:zulmet V-IV-DIR-AR  ; ! "oppress"
art:art V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "increase"
ay:ay V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "awake?"
az:az V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "to rut"
bay:bay V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "turn somebody off"
bez:bez V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "fed up"
bık:bık V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "fed up"
bit:bit V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "finish"
çak:çak V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "notice"
çap:çap V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "rush"
çarp:çarp V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "strike, hit"
cay:cay V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "retract"
çık:çık V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "get out, exit"
coş:coş V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "emotionalise"
din:din V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "quiet down"
doğ:doğ V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "born"
dol:dol V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "fill up"
don:don V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "freeze"
dön:dön V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "turn"
doy:doy V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "be full up"
dürt:dürt V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "poke"
düş:düş V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "fall"
duy:duy V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "hear"
eğ:eğ V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "bend"
er:er V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "attain"
gez:gez V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "go around"
gir:gir V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "enter"
git:git%{v%} V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "go"
gül:gül V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "laugh"
hamlet:hamlet V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "attribute"
incel:incel V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "get thinner"
kaç:kaç V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "escape"
kalk:kalk V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "get up"
kan:kan V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "be cheated"
kay:kay V-IV-DIR-AR ; ! "slide"
